src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/V2-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
  Verbs:
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: pangu
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: pange
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: pangem
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: panid
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: panite
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: panime
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: panid
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: panin
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: pannuvat
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: pannud
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: pannud
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: pannuks
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: pannuksid
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: pannuksite
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: pannuksime
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: pannuksid
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: pannuksin
     panema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: pani
     panema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: pandud
     panema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: pandud
     panema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: panduks
     panema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: pandav
     panema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: pandavat
     panema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: pandaks
     panema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: panda
     panema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff+Usage/NotNorm: pandakse
     panema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: pandagu
     panema+V+Impers+Sup: pandama
     panema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: pandi
     panema+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: panema
     panema+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: panemast
     panema+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: panemas
     panema+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: panemaks
     panema+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: panemata
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: panev
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: panevat
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: paned
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: paneks
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: paneksid
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: paneksite
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: paneksime
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: paneksid
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: paneksin
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: panen
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: paneme
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: panete
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: panevad
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: paneb
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: pane
     panema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: pane
     panema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: pannakse
     panema+V+Inf: panna
     panema+V+Ger: pannes
     pesema+V+Inf: pesta
     pesema+V+Ger: pestes
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: pesid
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: pesite
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: pesime
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: pesid
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: pesin
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: pesnuvat
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: pesnud
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: pesnud
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: pesnuks
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: pesnuksid
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: pesnuksite
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: pesnuksime
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: pesnuksid
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: pesnuksin
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: pesku
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: peske
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: peskem
     pesema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: pesi
     pesema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: pestud
     pesema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: pestud
     pesema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: pestuks
     pesema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: pestav
     pesema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: pestavat
     pesema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: pestaks
     pesema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: pesta
     pesema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: pestakse
     pesema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: pestagu
     pesema+V+Impers+Sup: pestama
     pesema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: pesti
     pesema+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: pesema
     pesema+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: pesemast
     pesema+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: pesemas
     pesema+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: pesemaks
     pesema+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: pesemata
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: pesev
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: pesevat
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: pesed
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: peseks
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: peseksid
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: peseksite
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: peseksime
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: peseksid
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: peseksin
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: pesen
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: peseme
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: pesete
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: pesevad
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: peseb
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: pese
     pesema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: pese
     puskma+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: puskma
     puskma+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: puskmast
     puskma+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: puskmas
     puskma+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: puskmaks
     puskma+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: puskmata
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: puskvat
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: pusku
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: puske
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: puskem
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: pusksid
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: pusksite
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: pusksime
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: pusksid
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: pusksin
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: pusknuvat
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: pusknud
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: pusknud
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: pusknuks
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: pusknuksid
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: pusknuksite
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: pusknuksime
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: pusknuksid
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: pusknuksin
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: puskev
     puskma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: puskis
     puskma+V+Inf: pusta
     puskma+V+Ger: pustes
     puskma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: pustud
     puskma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: pustud
     puskma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: pustuks
     puskma+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: pustav
     puskma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: pustavat
     puskma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: pustaks
     puskma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: pusta
     puskma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: pustakse
     puskma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: pustagu
     puskma+V+Impers+Sup: pustama
     puskma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: pusti
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: pused
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: puseks
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: puseksid
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: puseksite
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: puseksime
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: puseksid
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: puseksin
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: pusen
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: puseme
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: pusete
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: pusevad
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: puseb
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: puse
     puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: puse
     pidama+V+Inf: pidada
     pidama+V+Ger: pidades
     pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: pidagu
     pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: pidage
     pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: pidagem
     pidama+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: pidama
     pidama+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: pidamast
     pidama+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: pidamas
     pidama+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: pidamaks
     pidama+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: pidamata
     pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: pidav
     pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: pidavat
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: [pidas, pidi]
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: [pidasid, pidid]
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: [pidasite, pidite]
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: [pidasime, pidime]
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: [pidasid, pidid]
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: [pidasin, pidin]
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: pidanuvat
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: pidanud
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: pidanud
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: pidanuks
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: pidanuksid
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: pidanuksite
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: pidanuksime
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: pidanuksid
     pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: pidanuksin
     pooma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: poodud
     pooma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: poodud
     pooma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: pooduks
     pooma+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: poodav
     pooma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: poodavat
     pooma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: poodaks
     pooma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: pooda
     pooma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: poodagu
     pooma+V+Impers+Sup: poodama
     pooma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: poodi
     pooma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff+Usage/NotNorm: poodakse
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: poos
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: poosid
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: poosite
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: poosime
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: poosid
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: poosin
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: poogu
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: pooge
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: poogem
     pooma+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: pooma
     pooma+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: poomast
     pooma+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: poomas
     pooma+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: poomaks
     pooma+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: poomata
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: poov
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: poovat
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: pood
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: pooks
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: pooksid
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: pooksite
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: pooksime
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: pooksid
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: pooksin
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: poon
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: poome
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: poote
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: poovad
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: poob
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: poo
     pooma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: poo
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: poonuvat
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: poonud
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: poonud
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: poonuks
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: poonuksid
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: poonuksite
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: poonuksime
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: poonuksid
     pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: poonuksin
     pügama+V+Inf: pügada
     pügama+V+Ger: pügades
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: pügagu
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: pügage
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: pügagem
     pügama+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: pügama
     pügama+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: pügamast
     pügama+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: pügamas
     pügama+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: pügamaks
     pügama+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: pügamata
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: pügav
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: pügavat
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: pügas
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: pügasid
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: pügasite
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: pügasime
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: pügasid
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: pügasin
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: püganuvat
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: püganud
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: püganud
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: püganuks
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: püganuksid
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: püganuksite
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: püganuksime
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: püganuksid
     pügama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: püganuksin
     pügama+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: [pöetud, pügatud]
     pügama+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: [pöetud, pügatud]
     pügama+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: [pöetuks, pügatuks]
     pügama+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: [pöetav, pügatav]
     pügama+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: [pöetavat, pügatavat]
     pügama+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: [pöetaks, pügataks]
     pügama+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: [pöeta, pügata]
     pügama+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: [pöetakse, pügatakse]
     pügama+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: [pöetagu, pügatagu]
     pügama+V+Impers+Sup: [pöetama, pügatama]
     pügama+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: [pöeti, pügati]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: [pöad, pügad]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: [pöaks, pügaks]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: [pöaksid, pügaksid]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: [pöaksite, pügaksite]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: [pöaksime, pügaksime]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: [pöaksid, pügaksid]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: [pöaksin, pügaksin]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: [pöan, pügan]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: [pöame, pügame]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: [pöate, pügate]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: [pöavad, pügavad]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: [pöab, pügab]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: [pöa, püga]
     pügama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: [pöa, püga]
     pidama+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: peetud
     pidama+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: peetud
     pidama+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: peetuks
